Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 9

Osteopathic Physicians

63-9-101. Board — Composition and terms of members — Administrative support.

There shall be a board of osteopathic examination, referred to as “board” in this chapter, consisting of six (6) persons, appointed by the governor. One (1) of these persons shall be a citizen member who does not engage in any profession, business or activity subject to regulation by the board, and five (5) members shall be osteopathic physicians. These persons shall be residents of this state; and the five (5) osteopathic physician members shall be graduates of a legally chartered osteopathic college in good standing and having the power to confer degrees in osteopathic medicine and shall have been, at the time of their appointment, actively engaged in the practice of their profession for a period of at least five (5) years. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Their terms of office shall be so designated by the governor that the term of one (1) member shall expire each year. Thereafter, in each year the governor shall appoint one (1) person to fill the vacancy on the board, the term of the appointee to be five (5) years. A vacancy occurring from any other cause shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term in the same manner.

The board shall have a common seal and shall formulate rules to govern its actions.

The board shall receive administrative support from the division of health related boards, referred to as the “division” in this chapter.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 1; Shan., § 3654a4; mod. Code 1932, § 7003; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7003; Acts 1976, ch. 727, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-901; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 38; 1988, ch. 1013, § 47; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1996, ch. 1042, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-131 — 63-1-133, 68-1-101.

The Board of osteopathic examination, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Cross-References. Assignment of insurance benefits to health care provider, § 56-7-118.

Duties of osteopaths regarding known or suspected child sexual abuse, §§ 37-1-403, 37-1-605.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on osteopathic physicians, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-9-102. Meetings and records of board.

The board shall meet at the call of the president and at such other times and places as a majority of the board may appoint.

Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but no certificates of fitness to practice osteopathic medicine shall be granted on an affirmative vote of less than three (3).

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for certificates of fitness, giving the name and location of the institution granting the applicant the degree of doctor of or diploma in osteopathic medicine, the date of the applicant's diploma and also stating whether the applicant was rejected or a certificate granted. The books and register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded therein.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 1; Shan., § 3654a4; mod. Code 1932, § 7003; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7003; Acts 1976, ch. 727, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-902; Acts 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1996, ch. 1042, § 3.

63-9-103. Disposition of funds — Operating expenses — Compensation of members.

The board shall pay all money received as fees into the state treasury, and the commissioner of finance and administration shall make such allotments out of the general fund as the commissioner may deem proper for the necessary and proper expenses of the board. No expenditures shall be made by the board unless and until such allotment has been made by the commissioner. Such allotment shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per diem and expenses when actually engaged in the discharge of official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 3; Shan., § 3654a6; impl. am. Acts 1925, ch. 115, § 32; Code 1932, § 7005; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7005; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 29; 1976, ch. 727, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(100); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-903; Acts 2017, ch. 175, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “one hundred dollars ($100)” for “fifty dollars ($50)” in the first sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 175, § 2. April 24, 2017.

63-9-104. Application for certificate to practice — Special training and conditional licenses.

Before engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine, a person shall submit an application to the secretary of the board for a certificate of fitness to practice osteopathic medicine on a form prescribed by the board in writing or via online application, which includes:

The person's name, age, which shall not be less than eighteen (18) years, and residence;

The name of the school of osteopathic medicine from which the person was graduated, which shall have been in good repute as such at the time of the issuing of the person's diploma, as determined by the board;

The date of the person's diploma, evidence that such diploma was granted on personal attendance and completion of the course of study approved by the board;

Such other information as the board may require; and

Sufficient evidence that the applicant is of good moral character.

Each applicant shall pay a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board.

On notice of acceptance, each applicant for examination shall pay an examination fee as set by the board.

Each applicant accepted by reciprocity will pay a reciprocity fee as set by the board.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), osteopathic medical students, interns, residents, and clinical fellows, while participating in a training program approved by the American Osteopathic Association or the American Medical Association, performing duties assigned to meet the requirements of such a training program and while under the supervision and control of a physician, either a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a doctor of medicine licensed to practice in this state, are exempt from the requirement of a license. No such student, intern, resident, or clinical fellow shall be permitted to practice osteopathic medicine outside of the person's duties and responsibilities in the approved training program without being licensed to practice osteopathic medicine.

It is the responsibility of the program director or the dean responsible for the training program to apply to the board of osteopathic examination for an exemption for each such medical student, intern, resident, or clinical fellow. It is the responsibility of such program director or dean to notify the board of the termination of an applicant's participation in the training program, whether by completion of the program or for any other reason.

The board of osteopathic examination may impose a fee to accompany each application for exemption.

The board is authorized, in its discretion, to issue special training licenses to osteopathic medical interns, residents and fellows who have met all other qualifications for licensure contained in this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, with the exception of having completed the necessary residency or training programs required by subdivision (a)(4) and properly promulgated rules, and the licensure examination. The board also is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this new licensure category. The initial set of these rules may be processed as emergency rules pursuant to § 4-5-208. These special training licenses will be governed by the following:

Such licenses shall be issued only to osteopathic medical interns, residents and fellows while participating in a training program of one of the accredited medical schools or of one of such medical school's affiliated teaching hospitals in Tennessee, performing duties assigned to meet the requirements of such program and while under the supervision and control of a physician, either a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a doctor of medicine fully licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee;

No person holding a special training license is permitted to practice osteopathic medicine outside of such person's duties and responsibilities in the training program without being fully licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee. Termination of participation in the training program for which the special license was issued for any reason terminates that license;

It is the responsibility of the program director or the dean responsible for the training program to submit the necessary information and applications on behalf of each applicant. It also is the responsibility of the program director or the dean to notify the board of the termination of the applicant's participation in the training program, whether by completion of the program or for any other reason;

The board may impose fees to accompany each individual application for a special training license; and

Recipients of the special license shall not be subject to the occupational tax levied by § 67-4-1702(3)(A);

The board also has the authority to issue locum tenens and/or conditional licenses as it deems appropriate after reviewing the qualifications of applicants. In addition to the authority granted the board in § 63-9-111, the board has the authority to issue restricted licenses to current applicants or current licensees, or both, as it deems necessary, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a charitable clinic from employing or contracting with an osteopathic physician; provided, that the contractual relationship between the osteopathic physician and the charitable clinic is evidenced by a written contract, job description, or documentation, containing language that does not restrict the osteopathic physician from exercising independent professional medical judgment in diagnosing and treating patients.

For the purposes of this subsection (f), the term “charitable clinic” means an entity that meets the following standards:

Has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or is a distinct part of an entity that has received such a determination of exemption;

Has clinical facilities located in this state;

Has a primary mission to provide health care or dental care services to low-income, uninsured, or underserved individuals;

Provides one (1) or more of the following services for free or at a discounted rate:

Medical care;

Dental care;

Mental health care; or

Prescription medications;

Utilizes volunteer healthcare professionals and nonclinical volunteers; and

Is not required to be licensed under § 68-11-202(a)(1).

For the purposes of this section, the term “employing” shall not allow the employing of osteopathic physicians with the same specialties as those physicians exempted in § 63-6-204(e)(3).

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 2; Shan., § 3654a5; mod. Code 1932, § 7004; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7004; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 25; 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1973, ch. 44, § 1; 1976, ch. 727, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-904; Acts 1982, ch. 948, § 1; 1988, ch. 808, § 1; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 57-60; 1992, ch. 744, § 1; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1996, ch. 712, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; 2014, ch. 949, § 8; 2016, ch. 632, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 766, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Cross-References. Application for licenses, §§ 63-1-103, 63-9-122.

Law Reviews.

Health Professionals' Access to Hospitals: A Retrospective and Prospective Analysis, 34 Vand. L. Rev. 1161 (1981).

63-9-105. Examination of applicants — Reciprocity.

The board shall subject all applicants to an examination in the subjects of diagnosis, surgery, gynecology, obstetrics and such other subjects as the board may require. The board may, in its discretion, conduct its own written examination or administer a national examination.

The board may, in its discretion, dispense with an examination in the case of an osteopathic physician duly licensed to practice osteopathic medicine in any other state or territory of the United States or in the District of Columbia, if the applicant has met the same or equivalent educational standards required by the state of Tennessee, and shall present a certificate of examination and registration by the legally constituted board of such other state or district or a certificate issued by the national board of examiners for osteopathic physicians and surgeons.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 2; Shan., § 3654a5; mod. Code 1932, § 7004; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7004; Acts 1976, ch. 727, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-906; Acts 1982, ch. 948, § 2; 1994, ch. 901, § 4.

63-9-106. Right of licensees to practice — Cross-referrals.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of fitness by the board and the issuance of a license and a certificate of registration by the division as provided in chapter 1 of this title, the person receiving the same shall be entitled to practice in any county of this state osteopathic medicine, which is defined as a separate, complete and independent school of medicine and surgery utilizing full methods of diagnosis and treatment of physical and mental health and disease, including the prescription and administration of drugs, medicines and biologicals, operative surgery, obstetrics and radiological and other electromagnetic emissions, which places special emphasis on the interrelationship of the musculoskeletal system to other body systems as taught and practiced by recognized associated colleges of osteopathic medicine.

The provisions of chapter 6, part 6 of this title relative to cross-referral arrangements and physician ownership and investment interests in and referrals to a health care entity shall apply to any person practicing osteopathic medicine in this state.

Any osteopathic physician who makes or causes to be made a referral prohibited pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) is in violation of this chapter as of the dates specified in chapter 6, part 6 of this title. Willful violations of subdivision (b)(1) are considered unprofessional conduct, subject to licensure sanctions by the board of osteopathic examination, including suspension, revocation or other restriction deemed appropriate by the board. In addition, the board is authorized to impose civil penalties of an amount up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each prohibited referral.

When medical training and specialty board certification are considerations in the credentialing of osteopathic physicians, no state board, commission or department, created or existing, or hospital, health care facility, medical staff, professional service corporation or professional limited liability corporation, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, independent practice association, managed care organization, health plan or any other insurance provider shall discriminate, on the basis of education, against eligible osteopathic physicians who have:

Graduated from medical school and postdoctoral programs approved by either the American Osteopathic Association or the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education; or

Been awarded board eligibility or board certification by specialty boards recognized by either the American Osteopathic Association or the American Board of Medical Specialties.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 5; Shan., § 3654a8; Code 1932, § 7007; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7007; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-907; Acts 1994, ch. 901, §§ 1, 4; 1997, ch. 285, § 1.

Cross-References. Exemption from licensing requirements for practice of medicine, § 63-6-204.

Licensing by board for healing arts, § 63-1-104.

63-9-107. Renewal of certificates and licenses — Continuing education — Retirement.

Every registered osteopathic physician shall annually pay a renewal fee as set by the board; provided, that satisfactory evidence is presented to the board that such licensee in the year preceding the application for renewal successfully completed the required number of hours in courses, programs, internships or residencies as established and approved by the board through rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, as compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Each person having a certificate of registration or license shall be notified prior to the due date of the renewal fee.

When any licensed osteopathic physician shall fail to register and pay the annual registration fee within sixty (60) days after registration becomes due as provided in this section, the license of such person shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of the sixty (60) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this chapter may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license and, upon good cause being shown, the board, in its discretion, may reinstate such license upon payment of all past-due renewal fees and upon further payment of a sum to be set by the board.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months, and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (e).

Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7008.2; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 30; modified; Acts 1963, ch. 211, § 2; 1976, ch. 406, § 2; 1976, ch. 727, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-908; Acts 1982, ch. 948, § 3; 1984, ch. 937, §§ 39-41; 1986, ch. 675, § 7; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 33, 34; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 61, 62; 2001, ch. 245, § 1.

Cross-References. License renewals, § 63-1-107.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-9-108. Application of health laws.

Osteopathic physicians shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal regulations relating to:

The control of contagious diseases;

The reporting and certifying of births and deaths; and

All matters pertaining to public health.

Such reports shall be accepted by the officer or department to whom the same are made, equally with reports of physicians of any other school of medicine.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 4; Shan., § 3654a7; Code 1932, § 7006; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7006; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-909.

63-9-109. Penalties.

Any person who practices or pretends or attempts to practice or use the science or system of osteopathic medicine in treating diseases of the human body or any person who buys, sells or fraudulently obtains any diploma, certificate, license or record of registration to practice osteopathic medicine illegally obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation or who uses in any of the forms or letters, “osteopathy,” “osteopath,” “osteopathist,” “diplomate in osteopathy,” “D.O.,” “osteopathic physician,” “doctor of osteopathy,” or any other title or letters, either alone or with other qualifying words or phrases, under such circumstances as to induce the belief that the person who uses such term is engaged in the practice of osteopathic medicine without having complied with this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any lawfully qualified osteopathic physician or surgeon in any other state meeting a registered osteopathic practitioner in the state of Tennessee for consultation.

Acts 1905, ch. 255, § 6; Shan., § 3654a9; Code 1932, § 7008; Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 7008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-910; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 42; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1994, ch. 901, § 6.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-9-110. Investigation and prosecution of violations.

The board shall investigate every supposed violation of this chapter coming within the scope of the authority of such board and report to the proper district attorney general all cases that, in the judgment of the board, warrant prosecution.

Every police officer, sheriff and peace officer is charged with the duty of investigating every supposed violation of this chapter that comes to such officer's notice or of which such officer has received complaint and of apprehending and arresting all violators.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter and of the several district attorneys general to prosecute violations of this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-911.

Cross-References. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

63-9-111. Denial, suspension and revocation of licenses or certificates — Enjoining violations — Enforcement — Investigations.

The board has the power to:

Deny an application for a license to any applicant who applies for the same through reciprocity or otherwise;

Permanently or temporarily withhold issuance of a license;

Suspend or limit or restrict a previously issued license for such time and in such manner as the board may determine;

Reprimand or take such action in relation to disciplining an applicant or licensee as the board in its discretion may deem proper; or

Permanently revoke a license.

The grounds upon which the board shall exercise the powers set forth in subsection (a) include, but are not limited to:

Unprofessional, dishonorable or unethical conduct;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provisions of this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto or any criminal statute of the state;

Making false statements or representations, being guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining admission to practice or in being guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of medicine;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of medical practice;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs or the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or other drugs or stimulants in such manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice medicine;

Violation of the laws governing abortion;

The willful violation without legal justification of a privileged communication;

Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or causing financial gain or benefit for an employer, person, partnership, corporation or any other legal entity by a fraudulent representation or by the use of a fraudulent diagnosis, therapy or treatment;

Conviction of a felony, conviction of any offense under state or federal drug laws or conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude;

The use of any false or fraudulent statement in any document connected with practice under this chapter;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance or any other drug not in the course of professional practice, or not in good faith to relieve pain and suffering or not to cure an ailment, physical infirmity or disease;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing to any person a controlled substance or other drug if such person is addicted to the habit of using controlled substances without making a bona fide effort to cure the habit of such patient;

Dispensing, prescribing or otherwise distributing any controlled substance, controlled substance analogue or any other drug to any person in violation of any law of the state or the United States;

Engaging in the practice of medicine under a false or assumed name, or the impersonation of another practitioner, or a like, similar or different name;

Knowingly performing any act that in any way assists an unlicensed person to unlawfully practice as provided under this chapter;

Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of or conspiring to violate any provisions of this chapter;

The failure of the licensee to designate the licensee's professional degree in accordance with § 63-1-109;

Should any person holding a license to practice hereunder be adjudged mentally incompetent or insane by any final order or adjudication of any court of competent jurisdiction, the license of such person shall forthwith be automatically suspended upon the entry of the order, and such suspension shall be effective and continue until the licensee is found or adjudged by such court to be mentally competent or until such person is duly discharged as restored to mental competence in any other manner provided by law;

The advertising of medical business in which untrue or misleading statements are made or causing the publication or circulation of fraudulent advertising relative to any disease, human ailment or condition;

Engaging in the practice of medicine when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Disciplinary action against the licensee to practice medicine by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a licensee licensed in this state. A certified copy of the initial or final order or other equivalent document memorializing the disciplinary action from the disciplining state or territory shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation of this section and shall be sufficient grounds upon which to deny, restrict or condition licensure or renewal and/or discipline a licensee licensed in this state;

No person licensed in this state to practice osteopathy shall agree or contract with any clinical, bioanalytical or hospital laboratory, wherever located, to pay such laboratory for anatomic pathology services or cytology services and thereafter include such costs in the bill or statement submitted to the patient or any entity or person for payment, unless the practitioner is in compliance with the requirements of § 56-7-1015(g) and discloses on the bill or statement, or in writing by a separate disclosure statement in a minimum print size of ten (10) font, the name and address of the laboratory and the net amount or amounts paid or to be paid to the laboratory for the anatomic pathology services or cytology services. This subdivision (b)(22) shall not apply to the state or any local government; and

Transferring of patient medical information to a person in another state who is not licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in Tennessee using any electronic, telephonic or fiber optic means or by any other method if such information is employed to diagnose and/or treat persons physically located within Tennessee is prohibited;

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(23)(A), the transfer of such information shall not be prohibited if such information is:

To be used for a second opinion requested by a Tennessee licensed medical doctor or osteopathic physician;

To be used by an out-of-state physician for treatment of a person who is seeking treatment out of Tennessee;

Used to determine if such patient is covered by insurance;

Used by a physician in another state to provide occasional academic consultations to a medical school located in Tennessee;

Used by insurance or related companies for risk evaluation, utilization review, claims processing and/or evaluation of claimants’ rehabilitation, including establishing and administering rehabilitation plans. The establishing and administering of such rehabilitation plans shall not include the diagnosis and/or treatment of persons physically located within Tennessee; or

Used in clinical trials for drugs approved by the food and drug administration;

This subdivision (b)(23) does not apply to research hospitals, as defined in § 63-6-204(f)(7)(I);

This subdivision (b)(23) only applies to X-rays and medical imaging.

In enforcing this section, the board shall, upon probable cause, have authority to compel an applicant or licensee to submit to a mental and/or physical examination by a designated committee of at least three (3) practicing physicians, including a psychiatrist where a question of mental condition is involved.

Failure of an applicant or a licensee to submit to such examination when ordered shall constitute an admission of the allegations against the applicant or licensee, unless such failure was due to circumstances beyond the applicant's or licensee's control.

The applicant or licensee may have an independent medical practitioner present during such examination.

The committee will submit a report of its findings to the board, which will then hold a hearing as provided in this section.

All proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

In addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license or certificate, the board is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice osteopathy without possessing a valid license so to practice and to enjoin any unauthorized person, firm or corporation from performing any act or rendering any service in violation of this chapter.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of the state to hear and determine such causes as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

The board shall at all times have the power to call upon the district attorneys general in the various judicial districts to assist the board, and it is hereby declared to be the duty of all district attorneys general throughout the state to assist the board, upon its request, in any suit for injunction or prosecution instituted by the board without charge or additional compensation to the district attorneys general. The attorney general and reporter and the attorney general and reporter's assistants shall serve as legal advisers to the board.

The board, on its own motion, may investigate any report that an osteopathic physician is or may be in violation of subsection (b). Any osteopathic physician, any medical society or any other person who in good faith shall report to the board any information that an osteopathic physician is or may be in violation of subsection (b) shall not be subject to suit for civil damage as a result thereof.

The board, pursuant to duly promulgated rules, may, whenever a final order is issued after a disciplinary contested case hearing that contains findings that a licensee or other person has violated any provision of this chapter, assess the costs directly related to the prosecution of the case against the licensee or person.

Acts 1939, ch. 150, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7008.1; Acts 1963, ch. 211, § 3; 1976, ch. 727, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-912; Acts 1982, ch. 948, § 4; 1985, ch. 120, § 11; 1996, ch. 1042, §§ 4, 5; 1997, ch. 175, § 1; 1999, ch. 340, §§ 2-4; 2004, ch. 715, § 2; 2010, ch. 952, § 3; 2012, ch. 798, § 42; 2012, ch. 848, § 74.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (i) was redesignated as subdivision (b)(23) by the code commission in 2010.

Cross-References. Advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty, § 63-1-145.

Criminal background checks for health care providers, § 63-1-116.

Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Law Reviews.

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

63-9-112. Operation of X-ray equipment in physicians' offices — Adoption of rules and regulations establishing minimum educational standards.

The board shall have, in regard to operators of X-ray equipment and/or machines in physician offices, the authority, by rules and regulations, to:

Establish and issue limited X-ray certifications to qualified individuals in the areas of densitometry, chest, extremities, skull and/or sinus and lumbar spine;

Establish and issue full X-ray certifications to individuals who hold current and unrestricted national certification from the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;

Establish the minimum educational courses, curriculum, hours and standards that are prerequisite to issuance of the limited certificates;

Select the examination or examinations to be utilized as the board's limited certification examination or examinations and the prerequisites, if any, for admission to the examination or examinations. The board is authorized to enter into a contract or agreement with the chosen examination service or services or select an intermediary between the board and the examination service or services to process applicants for the examination or examinations;

Establish any other criteria for issuance of limited certificates that are reasonably related to the safe and competent performance of X-ray procedures;

Establish a mechanism for the board accreditation of educational courses that are operating for purposes of qualifying individuals for limited certification and that meet the requirements established pursuant to the rules promulgated under the authority of subdivision (a)(3) and that establish the causes and standards that are grounds for withdrawal of the course accreditation and the mechanism for that withdrawal;

Establish the fees to be paid for application and certification, renewal and late renewal of certificates and the fees required to be paid for application, renewal and late renewal of educational course accreditation; and

Establish the required number of hours, types of courses and methods of proving compliance for biennial continuing education for all certificate holders.

The certificates and accreditations issued pursuant to this section must be renewed and may be retired and reactivated pursuant to board established procedures. A person holding a certificate issued pursuant to this section may be disciplined for the same causes and under the same procedures as contained in § 63-6-214 for the medical board and § 63-9-111 for the board of osteopathic examination.

The standards established by the board pursuant to subsection (a) shall be at least as stringent as any mandatory federal standards.

No person shall perform X-ray procedures in a physician's office without being licensed as a physician or certified by the board pursuant to this section. Persons who have enrolled in a board recognized radiologic training program are exempt from the certification requirements of this section only as to X-ray procedures performed within or under the auspices of the program in which they are enrolled. After completion of the course but while awaiting the first opportunity to sit for the certification examination, but for no more than six (6) months, and for a period of time within which to receive the examination scores, but no more than seventy-five (75) days thereafter, such persons are exempt from the certification requirements of this section.

No X-ray procedures may be performed by any person holding a certificate issued pursuant to this section without:

An order from a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 6 of this title or an osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to this chapter; and

A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 6 of this title or an osteopathic physician licensed pursuant to this chapter exercising full supervision, responsibility and control over the services being provided. The board is authorized to establish, by rules and regulations, the levels of supervision required of physicians utilizing persons certified pursuant to this section.

A physician's office for purposes of this section means anywhere the practice of medicine as defined in § 63-6-204 or the practice of osteopathy as defined in § 63-9-106, which includes the performance of X-ray procedures contemplated by this section, is being conducted, except where that practice is conducted in or under the auspices of a facility or entity licensed by the department of health's division of health care facilities. The operation of a business in which X-ray procedures contemplated by this section are performed that is not owned by a physician, group of physicians, medical professional corporation, limited liability medical professional company or an entity or facility licensed by the division of health care facilities is prohibited.

Acts 1990, ch. 726, § 1; 2000, ch. 956, § 1.

Cross-References. Regulations for operation of X-ray equipment, § 63-6-224.